California statutes. Commercial Code
(3) Any sample or model that is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the whole of the goods will conform to the sample or model. 

(b) It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that the lessor use formal words, such as “warrant” or “guarantee,” or that the lessor have a specific intention to make a warranty, but an affirmation merely of the value of the goods or a
 statement purporting to be merely the lessor’s opinion or commendation of the goods does not create a warranty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 14.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10211.

(a) There is in a lease contract a warranty that for the lease term no person holds a claim to or interest in the goods that arose from an act or omission of the lessor, other than a claim by way of infringement or the like, which will interfere with the lessee’s enjoyment of its leasehold interest. 

(b) Except in a finance lease there is in a lease contract by a lessor who is a merchant regularly dealing in goods of the kind a warranty that the goods are delivered free of the rightful claim of any person by way of infringement or the like. 

(c) A lessee who furnishes specifications to a lessor or a supplier shall hold the lessor and the supplier harmless against any claim by way of infringement or the like that arises out of compliance with the specifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 15.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10212.

(a) Except in a finance lease, a warranty that the goods will be merchantable is implied in a lease contract if the lessor is a merchant with respect to goods of that kind. 

(b) Goods to be merchantable must be at least such as: 

(1) Pass without objection in the trade under the description in the lease agreement; 

(2) In the case of fungible goods, are of fair average quality within the description; 

(3) Are fit for the ordinary purposes for which goods of that type are used; 

(4) Run, within the variation permitted by the lease agreement, of even kind, quality, and quantity within each unit and among all units involved; 

(5) Are adequately contained, packaged, and labeled as the lease agreement may require; and 

(6) Conform to any promises or affirmations of fact made
 on the container or label. 

(c) Other implied warranties may arise from course of dealing or usage of trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 16.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10213.

Except in a finance lease, if the lessor at the time the lease contract is made has reason to know of any particular purpose for which the goods are required and that the lessee is relying on the lessor’s skill or judgment to select or furnish suitable goods, there is in the lease contract an implied warranty that the goods will be fit for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 5.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.

(a) Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to negate or limit a warranty must be construed wherever reasonable as consistent with each other; but, subject to the provisions of Section 10202 on parol or extrinsic evidence, negation or limitation is inoperative to the extent that the construction is unreasonable. 

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), to exclude or modify the implied warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language must mention “merchantability,” be by a writing, and be conspicuous. Subject to subdivision (c), to exclude or modify any implied warranty of fitness the exclusion must be by a writing and be conspicuous. Language to exclude all implied warranties of fitness is sufficient if it is in writing, is conspicuous and states, for example, “There is no warranty that the goods will be fit for a particular purpose.” 

(c) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (b), but subject to subdivision (d), 

(1) Unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties are excluded by expressions like “as is,” or “with all faults,” or by other language that in common understanding calls the lessee’s attention to the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is no implied warranty, if in writing and conspicuous; 

(2) If the lessee before entering into the lease contract has examined the goods or the sample or model as fully as desired or has refused to examine the goods, there is no implied warranty with regard to defects that an examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed; and 

(3) An implied warranty may also be excluded or modified by course of dealing, course of performance, or usage of trade. 

(d) To exclude or modify a warranty against interference or against infringement (Section 10211) or any part of it, the
 language must be specific, be by a writing, and be conspicuous, unless the circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade, give the lessee reason to know that the goods are being leased subject to a claim or interest of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 17.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.

Warranties, whether express or implied, must be construed as consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if that construction is unreasonable, the intention of the parties determines which warranty is dominant. In ascertaining that intention the following rules apply:

(1) Exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent sample or model or general language of description. 

(2) A sample from an existing bulk displaces inconsistent general language of description. 

(3) Express warranties displace inconsistent implied warranties other than an implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 18.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10217.

Identification of goods as goods to which a lease contract refers may be made at any time and in any manner explicitly agreed to by the parties. In the absence of explicit agreement, identification occurs:

(1) When the lease contract is made, if the lease contract is for a lease of goods that are existing and identified; 

(2) When the goods are shipped, marked, or otherwise designated by the lessor as goods to which the lease contract refers, if the lease contract is for a lease of goods that are not existing and identified; or 

(3) When the young are conceived, if the lease contract is for a lease of unborn young of animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 19.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10218.

(a) A lessee obtains an insurable interest when existing goods are identified to the lease contract even though the goods identified are nonconforming and the lessee has an option to reject them. 

(b) If a lessee has an insurable interest only by reason of the lessor’s identification of the goods, the lessor, until default or insolvency or notification to the lessee that identification is final, may substitute other goods for those identified. 

(c) Notwithstanding a lessee’s insurable interest under subdivisions (a) and (b), the lessor retains an insurable interest until an option to buy has been exercised by the lessee and risk of loss has passed to the lessee. 

(d) Nothing in this section impairs any insurable interest recognized under any other statute or rule of law. 

(e) The parties by agreement may determine that one or more parties have an
 obligation to obtain and pay for insurance covering the goods and by agreement may determine the beneficiary of the proceeds of the insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 20.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10219.

(a) Except in the case of a finance lease, risk of loss is retained by the lessor and does not pass to the lessee. In the case of a finance lease, risk of loss passes to the lessee. 

(b) Subject to the provisions of this division on the effect of default on risk of loss (Section 10220), if risk of loss is to pass to the lessee and the time of passage is not stated, the following rules apply: 

(1) If the lease contract requires or authorizes the goods to be shipped by carrier 

(A) And it does not require delivery at a particular destination, the risk of loss passes to the lessee when the goods are duly delivered to the carrier; but 

(B) If it does require delivery at a particular destination and the goods are there duly tendered while in the possession of the carrier, the risk of loss passes to the lessee when the goods are there duly so tendered as to
 enable the lessee to take delivery. 

(2) If the goods are held by a bailee to be delivered without being moved, the risk of loss passes to the lessee on acknowledgment by the bailee of the lessee’s right to possession of the goods. 

(3) In any case not within paragraph (1) or (2), the risk of loss passes to the lessee on the lessee’s receipt of the goods if the lessor, or, in the case of a finance lease, the supplier, is a merchant; otherwise the risk passes to the lessee on tender of delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 21.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10220.

(a) Where risk of loss is to pass to the lessee and the time of passage is not stated: 

(1) If a tender or delivery of goods so fails to conform to the lease contract as to give a right of rejection, the risk of their loss remains with the lessor, or, in the case of a finance lease, the supplier, until cure or acceptance. 

(2) If the lessee rightfully revokes acceptance, he or she, to the extent of any deficiency in his or her effective insurance coverage, may treat the risk of loss as having remained with the lessor from the beginning. 

(b) Whether or not risk of loss is to pass to the lessee, if the lessee as to conforming goods already identified to a lease contract repudiates or is otherwise in default under the lease contract, the lessor, or, in the case of a finance lease, the supplier, to the extent of any deficiency in his or her effective insurance coverage may treat the risk
 of loss as resting on the lessee for a commercially reasonable time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 22.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10221.

If a lease contract requires goods identified when the lease contract is made, and the goods suffer casualty without fault of the lessee, the lessor, or the supplier before delivery, or the goods suffer casualty before risk of loss passes to the lessee pursuant to the lease agreement or Section 10219, then:

(1) If the loss is total, the lease contract is avoided; and 

(2) If the loss is partial or the goods have so deteriorated as to no longer conform to the lease contract, the lessee may nevertheless demand inspection and at his or her option either treat the lease contract as avoided or, except in a finance lease, accept the goods with due allowance from the rent payable for the balance of the lease term for the deterioration or the deficiency in quantity but without further right against the lessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 23.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Effect of Lease Contract [10301. - 10311.]

10301.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, a lease contract is effective and enforceable according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of the goods, and against creditors of the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 24.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, each provision of this division applies whether the lessor or a third party has title to the goods, and whether the lessor, the lessee, or a third party has possession of the goods, notwithstanding any statute or rule of law that possession or the absence of possession is fraudulent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 5.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

10303.

(a) As used in the section, “creation of a security interest” includes the sale of a lease contract that is subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), Secured Transactions, by reason of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9109.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c) and Section 9407, a provision in a lease agreement which (1) prohibits the voluntary or involuntary transfer, including a transfer by sale, sublease, creation or enforcement of a security interest, or attachment, levy, or other judicial process, of an interest of a party under the lease contract or of the lessor’s residual interest in the goods, or (2) makes such a transfer an event of default, gives rise to the rights and remedies provided in subdivision (d), but a transfer that is prohibited or is an event of default under the lease agreement is otherwise effective.

(c) A provision in a lease agreement which (1) prohibits a
 transfer of a right to damages for default with respect to the whole lease contract or of a right to payment arising out of the transferor’s due performance of the transferor’s entire obligation, or (2) makes such a transfer an event of default, is not enforceable, and such a transfer is not a transfer that materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance by, materially changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on, the other party to the lease contract within the purview of subdivision (d).

(d) Subject to subdivision (c) and Section 9407:

(1) If a transfer is made which is made an event of default under a lease agreement, the party to the lease contract not making the transfer, unless that party waives the default or otherwise agrees, has the rights and remedies described in subdivision (b) of Section 10501.

(2) If paragraph (1) is not applicable and if a transfer is made that
 (A) is prohibited under a lease agreement or (B) materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance by, materially changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on, the other party to the lease contract, unless the party not making the transfer agrees at any time to the transfer in the lease contract or otherwise, then, except as limited by contract, (C) the transferor is liable to the party not making the transfer for damages caused by the transfer to the extent that the damages could not reasonably be prevented by the party not making the transfer and (D) a court having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief, including cancellation of the lease contract or an injunction against the transfer.

(e) A transfer of “the lease” or of “all my rights under the lease,” or a transfer in similar general terms, is a transfer of rights and, unless the language or the circumstances, as in a transfer for security, indicate the contrary, the
 transfer is a delegation of duties by the transferor to the transferee. Acceptance by the transferee constitutes a promise by the transferee to perform those duties. The promise is enforceable by either the transferor or the other party to the lease contract.

(f) Unless otherwise agreed by the lessor and the lessee, a delegation of performance does not relieve the transferor as against the other party of any duty to perform or of any liability for default.

(g) In a consumer lease, to prohibit the transfer of an interest of a party under the lease contract or to make a transfer an event of default, the language must be specific, by a writing, and conspicuous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

10304.

(a) Subject to Section 10303, a subsequent lessee from a lessor of goods under an existing lease contract obtains, to the extent of the leasehold interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that the lessor had or had power to transfer, and, except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section and subdivision (d) of Section 10527, takes subject to the existing lease contract. A lessor with voidable title has power to transfer a good leasehold interest to a good faith subsequent lessee for value, but only to the extent set forth in the preceding sentence. If goods have been delivered under a transaction of purchase, the lessor has that power even though: 

(1) The lessor’s transferor was deceived as to the identity of the lessor; 

(2) The delivery was in exchange for a check which is later dishonored; 

(3) It was agreed that the transaction was to be a “cash sale”; or 

(4) The delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under the criminal law. 

(b) A subsequent lessee in the ordinary course of business from a lessor who is a merchant dealing in goods of that kind to whom the goods were entrusted by the existing lessee of that lessor before the interest of the subsequent lessee became enforceable against that lessor obtains, to the extent of the leasehold interest transferred, all of that lessor’s and the existing lessee’s rights to the goods, and takes free of the existing lease contract. 

(c) A subsequent lessee from the lessor of goods that are subject to an existing lease contract and are covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction takes no greater rights than those provided both by this section and by the certificate of title statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 26.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10305.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 10303, a buyer or sublessee from the lessee of goods under an existing lease contract obtains, to the extent of the interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that the lessee had or had power to transfer, and, except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section and subdivision (d) of Section 10511, takes subject to the existing lease contract. A lessee with a voidable leasehold interest has power to transfer a good leasehold interest to a good faith buyer for value or a good faith sublessee for value, but only to the extent set forth in the preceding sentence. When goods have been delivered under a transaction of lease the lessee has that power even though: 

(1) The lessor was deceived as to the identity of the lessee; 

(2) The delivery was in exchange for a check which is later dishonored; or 

(3) The delivery was procured
 through fraud punishable as larcenous under the criminal law. 

(b) A buyer in the ordinary course of business or a sublessee in the ordinary course of business from a lessee who is a merchant dealing in goods of that kind to whom the goods were entrusted by the lessor obtains, to the extent of the interest transferred, all of the lessor’s and lessee’s rights to the goods, and takes free of the existing lease contract. 

(c) A buyer or sublessee from the lessee of goods that are subject to an existing lease contract and are covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction takes no greater rights than those provided both by this section and by the certificate of title statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 27.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10306.

If a person in the ordinary course of his or her business furnishes services or materials with respect to goods subject to a lease contract, a lien upon those goods in the possession of that person given by statute or rule of law for those materials or services takes priority over any interest of the lessor or lessee under the lease contract or this division unless the lien is created by statute and the statute provides otherwise or unless the lien is created by rule of law and the rule of law provides otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 5.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

10307.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 10306, a creditor of a lessee takes subject to the lease contract.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) and in Sections 10306 and 10308, a creditor of a lessor takes subject to the lease contract unless the creditor holds a lien that attached to the goods before the lease contract became enforceable.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 9317, 9321, and 9323, a lessee takes a leasehold interest subject to a security interest held by a creditor of the lessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.

(a) A creditor of a lessor in possession of goods subject to a lease contract may treat the lease contract as void if as against the creditor retention of possession by the lessor is fraudulent or void under any statute or rule of law, but retention of possession in good faith and current course of trade by the lessor for a commercially reasonable time after the lease contract becomes enforceable is not fraudulent or void. 

(b) Nothing in this division impairs the rights of creditors of a lessor if the lease contract is made under circumstances which under any statute or rule of law apart from this division would constitute the transaction a fraudulent transfer or voidable preference. 

(c) A creditor of a seller may treat a sale or an identification of goods to a contract for sale as void if as against the creditor retention of possession by the seller is fraudulent under any statute or rule of law, but retention
 of possession of the goods pursuant to a lease contract entered into by the seller as lessee and the buyer as lessor in connection with the sale or identification of the goods is not fraudulent if the buyer bought for value and in good faith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 29.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.

(a) In this section:

(1) Goods are “fixtures” when they become so related to particular real estate that an interest in them arises under real estate law;

(2) A “fixture filing” is the filing, in the office where a record of a mortgage on the real estate would be recorded, of a financing statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and conforming to the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9502;

(3) A lease is a “purchase money lease” unless the lessee has possession or use of the goods or the right to possession or use of the goods before the lease agreement is enforceable;

(4) A mortgage is a “construction mortgage” to the extent it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on land including the acquisition cost of the land, if the recorded writing so indicates; and

(5) “Encumbrance” includes real estate mortgages and other liens on real estate and all other rights in real estate that are not ownership interests.

(b) Under this division a lease may be of goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures, but no lease exists under this division of ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

(c) This division does not prevent creation of a lease of fixtures pursuant to real estate law.

(d) The interest of a lessor of fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate if:

(1) The lease is a purchase money lease, the conflicting interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures, a fixture filing covering the fixtures is filed before the goods become fixtures or within 20 days thereafter, and the lessee has an interest of record
 in the real estate or is in possession of the real estate;

(2) A fixture filing covering the fixtures is filed before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record, the lessor’s interest has priority over any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner, and the lessee has an interest of record in the real estate or is in possession of the real estate;

(3) The fixtures are readily removable factory or office machines, readily removable equipment that is not primarily used or leased for use in the operation of the real estate, or readily removable replacements of domestic appliances that are goods subject to a consumer lease;

(4) The conflicting interest is a lien on the real estate obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the lease contract is enforceable;

(5) The encumbrancer or owner has consented in writing to the lease or has disclaimed an
 interest in the goods as fixtures; or

(6) The lessee has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner. If the lessee’s right to remove terminates, the priority of the interest of the lessor continues for a reasonable time.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) but otherwise subject to subdivision (d), the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, is subordinate to the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real estate under a construction mortgage recorded before the goods become fixtures if the goods become fixtures before the completion of the construction. To the extent given to refinance a construction mortgage, the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real estate under a mortgage has this priority to the same extent as the encumbrancer of the real estate under the construction mortgage.

(f) In cases not within the preceding
 subdivisions, priority between the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, and the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate who is not the lessee is determined by the priority rules governing conflicting interests in real estate.

(g) If the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, has priority over all conflicting interests of all owners and encumbrancers of the real estate, the lessor or the lessee may (1) on default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease agreement but subject to the lease agreement and this division, or (2) if necessary to enforce other rights and remedies of the lessor or lessee under this division, remove the goods from the real estate, free and clear of all conflicting interests of all owners and encumbrancers of the real estate, but the lessor or lessee must reimburse any encumbrancer or owner of the real estate who is not the lessee and who has
 not otherwise agreed for the cost of repair of any physical injury, but not for any diminution in value of the real estate caused by the absence of the goods removed or by any necessity of replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the performance of this obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

10310.

(a) Goods are “accessions” when they are installed in or affixed to other goods. 

(b) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract entered into before the goods became accessions is superior to all interests in the whole except as stated in subdivision (d). 

(c) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract entered into at the time or after the goods became accessions is superior to all subsequently acquired interests in the whole except as stated in subdivision (d) but is subordinate to interests in the whole existing at the time the lease contract was made unless the holders of such interests in the whole have in writing consented to the lease or disclaimed an interest in the goods as part of the whole. 

(d) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract described in subdivision (b) or (c) is subordinate to the interest of: 

(1) A buyer in the ordinary course of business or a lessee in the ordinary course of business of any interest in the whole acquired after the goods became accessions; or

(2) A creditor with a security interest in the whole perfected before the lease contract was made to the extent that the creditor makes subsequent advances without knowledge of the lease contract. 

(e) When under subdivision (b) or subdivisions (c) and (d) a lessor or a lessee of accessions holds an interest that is superior to all interests in the whole, the lessor or the lessee may (1) on default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease contract by the other party but subject to the provisions of the lease contract and this division, or (2) if necessary to enforce his or her other rights and remedies under this division, remove the goods from the whole, free and clear of all interests in the whole, but he or she must reimburse any holder of an interest in
 the whole who is not the lessee and who has not otherwise agreed for the cost of repair of any physical injury but not for any diminution in value of the whole caused by the absence of the goods removed or by any necessity for replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the performance of this obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 31.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.

Nothing in this division prevents subordination by agreement by any person entitled to priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 32.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Performance of Leased Contract: Repudiated, Substituted, and Excused [10401. - 10407.]

10401.

(a) A lease contract imposes an obligation on each party that the other’s expectation of receiving due performance will not be impaired. 

(b) If reasonable grounds for insecurity arise with respect to the performance of either party, the insecure party may demand in writing adequate assurance of due performance. Until the insecure party receives that assurance, if commercially reasonable the insecure party may suspend any performance for which he or she has not already received the agreed return. 

(c) A repudiation of the lease contract occurs if assurance of due performance adequate under the circumstances of the particular case is not provided to the insecure party within a reasonable time, not to exceed 30 days after receipt of a demand by the other party. 

(d) Between merchants, the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity and the adequacy of any assurance offered must be
 determined according to commercial standards. 

(e) Acceptance of any nonconforming delivery or payment does not prejudice the aggrieved party’s right to demand adequate assurance of future performance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 33.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.

(a) If either party repudiates a lease contract, other than a consumer lease, with respect to a performance not yet due under the lease contract, the loss of which performance will substantially impair the value of the lease contract to the other, the aggrieved party may: 

(1) For a commercially reasonable time, await retraction of repudiation and performance by the repudiating party; 

(2) Make demand pursuant to Section 10401 and await assurance of future performance adequate under the circumstances of the particular case; or 

(3) Resort to any right or remedy upon default under the lease contract or this division, even though the aggrieved party has notified the repudiating party that the aggrieved party would await the repudiating party’s performance and assurance and has urged retraction. In addition, whether or not the aggrieved party is pursuing one of the foregoing remedies,
 the aggrieved party may suspend performance or, if the aggrieved party is the lessor, proceed in accordance with the provisions of this division on the lessor’s right to identify goods to the lease contract notwithstanding default or to salvage unfinished goods (Section 10524).

(b) The rights and remedies of the parties to a consumer lease in connection with a repudiation of that lease shall be determined under other laws, and this section shall not affect the applicability or interpretation of those laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 34.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.

(a) Until the repudiating party’s next performance is due, the repudiating party can retract the repudiation unless, since the repudiation, the aggrieved party has canceled the lease contract or materially changed the aggrieved party’s position or otherwise indicated that the aggrieved party considers the repudiation final. 

(b) Retraction may be by any method that clearly indicates to the aggrieved party that the repudiating party intends to perform under the lease contract and includes any assurance demanded under Section 10401. 

(c) Retraction reinstates a repudiating party’s rights under a lease contract with due excuse and allowance to the aggrieved party for any delay occasioned by the repudiation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 35.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.

(a) If without fault of the lessee, the lessor, and the supplier, the agreed berthing, loading, or unloading facilities fail or the agreed type of carrier becomes unavailable or the agreed manner of delivery otherwise becomes commercially impracticable, but a commercially reasonable substitute is available, the substitute performance must be tendered and accepted. 

(b) If the agreed means or manner of payment fails because of domestic or foreign governmental regulation: 

(1) The lessor may withhold or stop delivery or cause the supplier to withhold or stop delivery unless the lessee provides a means or manner of payment that is commercially a substantial equivalent; and 

(2) If delivery has already been taken, payment by the means or in the manner provided by the regulation discharges the lessee’s obligation unless the regulation is discriminatory, oppressive, or predatory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 36.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.

Subject to Section 10404 on substituted performance, the following rules apply:

(1) Delay in delivery or nondelivery in whole or in part by a lessor or a supplier who complies with paragraphs (2) and (3) is not a default under the lease contract if performance as agreed has been made impracticable by the occurrence of a contingency the nonoccurrence of which was a basic assumption on which the lease contract was made or by compliance in good faith with any applicable foreign or domestic governmental regulation or order, whether or not the regulation or order later proves to be invalid. 

(2) If the causes mentioned in paragraph (1) affect only part of the lessor’s or the supplier’s capacity to perform, he or she shall allocate production and deliveries among his or her customers but at his or her option may include regular customers not then under contract for sale or lease as well as his or her own requirements for further
 manufacture. He or she may so allocate in any manner that is fair and reasonable. 

(3) The lessor seasonably shall notify the lessee and in the case of a finance lease the supplier seasonably shall notify the lessor and the lessee, if known, that there will be delay or nondelivery and, if allocation is required under paragraph (2), of the estimated quota thus made available for the lessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 37.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.

(a) If the lessee receives notification of a material or indefinite delay or an allocation justified under Section 10405, the lessee may by written notification to the lessor as to any goods involved, and with respect to all of the goods if under an installment lease contract the value of the whole lease contract is substantially impaired (Section 10510): 

(1) Terminate the lease contract (subdivision (b) of Section 10505); or 

(2) Except in a finance lease, modify the lease contract by accepting the available quota in substitution, with due allowance from the rent payable for the balance of the lease term for the deficiency but without further right against the lessor. 

(b) If, after receipt of a notification from the lessor under Section 10405, the lessee fails so to modify the lease agreement within a reasonable time not exceeding 30 days, the lease contract lapses with respect to
 any deliveries affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 38.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10407.

(a) In the case of a finance lease that is not a consumer lease the lessee’s promises under the lease contract become irrevocable and independent upon the lessee’s acceptance of the goods. 

(b) A promise that has become irrevocable and independent under subdivision (a): 

(1) Is effective and enforceable between the parties, and by or against third parties including assignees of the parties; and 

(2) Is not subject to cancellation, termination, modification, repudiation, excuse, or substitution without the consent of the party to whom the promise runs. 

(c) This section does not affect the validity under any other law of a covenant in any lease contract making the lessee’s promises irrevocable and independent upon the lessee’s acceptance of the goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 39.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Default [10501. - 10532.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [10501. - 10507.]

10501.

(a) Whether the lessor or the lessee is in default under a lease contract is determined by the lease agreement and this division.

(b) If the lessor or the lessee is in default under the lease contract, the party seeking enforcement has rights and remedies as provided in this division and, except as limited by this division, as provided in the lease agreement.

(c) If the lessor or the lessee is in default under the lease contract, the party seeking enforcement may reduce the party’s claim to judgment, or otherwise enforce the lease contract by self-help or any available judicial procedure or nonjudicial procedure, including administrative proceeding, arbitration, or the like, in accordance with this division.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a) of
 Section 1305 or this division or the lease agreement, the rights and remedies referred to in subdivisions (b) and (c) are cumulative.

(e) If the lease agreement covers both real property and goods, the party seeking enforcement may proceed under this chapter as to the goods, or under other applicable law as to both the real property and the goods in accordance with that party’s rights and remedies in respect of the real property, in which case this chapter does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.
